Utah statutes.
11-4-2.   Duty of local governing body -- Maintenance of existing equipment.
(1)  Each local governing body installing any completely new fire protection
system shall comply with Title 53, Chapter 7, Utah Fire Prevention and Safety
Act.
(2)  A local governing body operating fire protection equipment may maintain,
repair, replace, and extend  the equipment with equipment of like character
and standards.
